6.4.1/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX wV Y 74
SFX wV tre tre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre po:infi
SFX wV croître croissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' croître po:ppre
SFX wV croitre croissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' croitre po:ppre
SFX wV croître cru/L'D'Q' croître po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wV croître crus/D'Q' croître po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wV croître crue/L'D'Q' croître po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wV croître crues/D'Q' croître po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wV croitre cru/L'D'Q' croitre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX wV croitre crus/D'Q' croitre po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX wV croitre crue/L'D'Q' croitre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX wV croitre crues/D'Q' croitre po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX wV croître crois/n'q'j'l'm't' croître po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croître croît/n'q'l's' croître po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wV croître croissons/n'q'l' croître po:ipre po:1pl
SFX wV croître croissez/n'q'l' croître po:ipre po:2pl
SFX wV croître croissent/n'q'l's' croître po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX wV croitre crois/n'q'j'l'm't' croitre po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croitre croit/n'q'l's' croitre po:ipre po:3sg
SFX wV croitre croissons/n'q'l' croitre po:ipre po:1pl
SFX wV croitre croissez/n'q'l' croitre po:ipre po:2pl
SFX wV croitre croissent/n'q'l's' croitre po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX wV croître croissais/n'q'j'l'm't' croître po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croître croissait/n'q'l's' croître po:iimp po:3sg
SFX wV croître croissions/n'q'l' croître po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX wV croître croissiez/n'q'l' croître po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX wV croître croissaient/n'q'l's' croître po:iimp po:3pl
SFX wV croitre croissais/n'q'j'l'm't' croitre po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croitre croissait/n'q'l's' croitre po:iimp po:3sg
SFX wV croitre croissions/n'q'l' croitre po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX wV croitre croissiez/n'q'l' croitre po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX wV croitre croissaient/n'q'l's' croitre po:iimp po:3pl
SFX wV croître crus/n'q'j'l'm't' croître po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croître crut/n'q'l's' croître po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX wV croître crûmes/n'q'l' croître po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX wV croître crûtes/n'q'l' croître po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX wV croître crurent/n'q'l's' croître po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX wV croitre crus/n'q'j'l'm't' croitre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV croitre crut/n'q'l's' croitre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX wV croitre crûmes/n'q'l' croitre po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX wV croitre crûtes/n'q'l' croitre po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX wV croitre crurent/n'q'l's' croitre po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX wV tre trai/n'q'j'l'm' tre po:ifut po:1sg
SFX wV tre tras/n'q'l't' tre po:ifut po:2sg
SFX wV tre tra/n'q'l's' tre po:ifut po:3sg
SFX wV tre trons/n'q'l' tre po:ifut po:1pl
SFX wV tre trez/n'q'l' tre po:ifut po:2pl
SFX wV tre tront/n'q'l's' tre po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX wV tre trais/n'q'j'l'm't' tre po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX wV tre trait/n'q'l's' tre po:cond po:3sg
SFX wV tre trions/n'q'l' tre po:cond po:1pl
SFX wV tre triez/n'q'l' tre po:cond po:2pl
SFX wV tre traient/n'q'l's' tre po:cond po:3pl
SFX wV croître croisse/n'q'j'l'm's' croître po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX wV croître croisses/n'q'l't' croître po:spre po:2sg
SFX wV croitre croisse/n'q'j'l'm's' croitre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX wV croitre croisses/n'q'l't' croitre po:spre po:2sg
SFX wV croître crusse/n'q'j'l'm' croître po:simp po:1sg
SFX wV croître crusses/n'q'l't' croître po:simp po:2sg
SFX wV croître crût/n'q'l's' croître po:simp po:3sg
SFX wV croître crussions/n'q'l' croître po:simp po:1pl
SFX wV croître crussiez/n'q'l' croître po:simp po:2pl
SFX wV croître crussent/n'q'l's' croître po:simp po:3pl
SFX wV croitre crusse/n'q'j'l'm' croitre po:simp po:1sg
SFX wV croitre crusses/n'q'l't' croitre po:simp po:2sg
SFX wV croitre crût/n'q'l's' croitre po:simp po:3sg
SFX wV croitre crussions/n'q'l' croitre po:simp po:1pl
SFX wV croitre crussiez/n'q'l' croitre po:simp po:2pl
SFX wV croitre crussent/n'q'l's' croitre po:simp po:3pl
SFX wV croître crois/n'l'm' croître po:impe po:2sg
SFX wV croître croissons/n'l' croître po:impe po:1pl
SFX wV croître croissez/n'l'm' croître po:impe po:2pl
SFX wV croitre crois/n'l'm' croitre po:impe po:2sg
SFX wV croitre croissons/n'l' croitre po:impe po:1pl
SFX wV croitre croissez/n'l'm' croitre po:impe po:2pl
SFX xA N 43
SFX xA roire roire croire po:infi
SFX xA roire royant croire po:ppre
SFX xA roire ru croire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX xA roire rus croire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX xA roire rue croire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xA roire rues croire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xA roire rois croire po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xA roire roit croire po:ipre po:3sg
SFX xA roire royons croire po:ipre po:1pl
SFX xA roire royez croire po:ipre po:2pl
SFX xA roire roient croire po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX xA roire royais croire po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xA roire royait croire po:iimp po:3sg
SFX xA roire royions croire po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX xA roire royiez croire po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX xA roire royaient croire po:iimp po:3pl
SFX xA roire rus croire po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xA roire rut croire po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX xA roire rûmes croire po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX xA roire rûtes croire po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX xA roire rurent croire po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX xA roire roirai croire po:ifut po:1sg
SFX xA roire roiras croire po:ifut po:2sg
SFX xA roire roira croire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX xA roire roirons croire po:ifut po:1pl
SFX xA roire roirez croire po:ifut po:2pl
SFX xA roire roiront croire po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX xA roire roirais croire po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xA roire roirait croire po:cond po:3sg
SFX xA roire roirions croire po:cond po:1pl
SFX xA roire roiriez croire po:cond po:2pl
SFX xA roire roiraient croire po:cond po:3pl
SFX xA roire roie croire po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX xA roire roies croire po:spre po:2sg
SFX xA roire russe croire po:simp po:1sg
SFX xA roire russes croire po:simp po:2sg
SFX xA roire rût croire po:simp po:3sg
SFX xA roire russions croire po:simp po:1pl
SFX xA roire russiez croire po:simp po:2pl
SFX xA roire russent croire po:simp po:3pl
SFX xA roire rois croire po:impe po:2sg
SFX xA roire royons croire po:impe po:1pl
SFX xA roire royez croire po:impe po:2pl
SFX xC N 43
SFX xC oire oire boire po:infi
SFX xC oire uvant boire po:ppre
SFX xC oire u boire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX xC oire us boire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX xC oire ue boire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xC oire ues boire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xC oire ois boire po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xC oire oit boire po:ipre po:3sg
SFX xC oire uvons boire po:ipre po:1pl
SFX xC oire uvez boire po:ipre po:2pl
SFX xC oire oivent boire po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX xC oire uvais boire po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xC oire uvait boire po:iimp po:3sg
SFX xC oire uvions boire po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX xC oire uviez boire po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX xC oire uvaient boire po:iimp po:3pl
SFX xC oire us boire po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xC oire ut boire po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX xC oire ûmes boire po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX xC oire ûtes boire po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX xC oire urent boire po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX xC oire oirai boire po:ifut po:1sg
SFX xC oire oiras boire po:ifut po:2sg
SFX xC oire oira boire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX xC oire oirons boire po:ifut po:1pl
SFX xC oire oirez boire po:ifut po:2pl
SFX xC oire oiront boire po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX xC oire oirais boire po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xC oire oirait boire po:cond po:3sg
SFX xC oire oirions boire po:cond po:1pl
SFX xC oire oiriez boire po:cond po:2pl
SFX xC oire oiraient boire po:cond po:3pl
SFX xC oire oive boire po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX xC oire oives boire po:spre po:2sg
SFX xC oire usse boire po:simp po:1sg
SFX xC oire usses boire po:simp po:2sg
SFX xC oire ût boire po:simp po:3sg
SFX xC oire ussions boire po:simp po:1pl
SFX xC oire ussiez boire po:simp po:2pl
SFX xC oire ussent boire po:simp po:3pl
SFX xC oire ois boire po:impe po:2sg
SFX xC oire uvons boire po:impe po:1pl
SFX xC oire uvez boire po:impe po:2pl
